California, session 20252026, AB413.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50406.1 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50406.1. Pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 50406, the department shall review all guidelines it has adopted or amended to determine whether those guidelines explain rights or services available to the public. The department shall translate guidelines meeting that criteria into any non-English languages spoken by a substantial number of non-English-speaking people, as defined in Section 7296.2 of the Government Code.